South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3757.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 55-11-320 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 55-11-320. The corporate powers and duties of the Richland-Lexington Airport District must be exercised and performed by a commission to be known as Richland-Lexington Airport Commission. The commission must be composed of twelvefourteen members. FiveSeven members must be appointed by the Lexington County Legislative Delegation, five members must be appointed by the Richland County Legislative Delegation, and two members must be appointed by the City Council of the City of Columbia. At least two of the seven members appointed by the Lexington County Legislative Delegation must be residents of Cayce or West Columbia. The members of the commission shall serve for terms of four years and until their successors are appointed. Members may not serve more than two consecutive terms. In the event of a vacancy for any reason, other than the expiration of a term, a successor must be appointed in the same manner of the original appointment for the balance of the unexpired term. Any member may be removed by the appointing authority for neglect of duty, misconduct, or malfeasance in office after being given a written statement of reasons and an opportunity to be heard. Notwithstanding the expiration of the term of office of any member, he shall continue to serve until his successor shall have been appointed, but any delay in appointing a successor shall not extend the term of the successor. The members of the commission shall serve without compensation, except for their actual and necessary expenses while in performance of duties prescribed under this article. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----